Illinois, session 104th, SB2768.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. "An Act concerning employment", Public Act 5104-17, is amended by changing Section 99 as follows: 6    (P.A. 104-17, Sec. 99)7    Sec. 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 82026 upon becoming law.9(Source: P.A. 104-17, eff. 6-30-25.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.